apertium-hye-eng.hye.dix
    <pardef n="խոս/ել__vblex_tv_1"> <!-- caus/pass: This paradigm implements the forms which cannot take negative -->

      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="decl-prc-1"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>վ</l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pass"/></r></p><par n="սիրվ/ել__pass_1"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>եին</l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ի՛</l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ե՛ք</l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>եցե՛ք</l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="թռ/չել__vblex_iv_2"> <!-- no pass: This paradigm implements the synthetic 
                                         forms and participles which can take negative -->
      <e>       <p><l>չ</l><r>չել<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="decl-prc-2"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l></l><r>չել<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/></r></p><par n="decl-aor-pers-2"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>չ</l><r>չել<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fts"/></r></p><par n="decl-fts-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>չ</l><r>չել<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="ftk"/></r></p><par n="decl-ftk-pers-1"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"> <!-- no pass: This paradigm implements the synthetic 
                                         forms and participles which can take negative -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="decl-prc-2"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/></r></p><par n="decl-aor-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fts"/></r></p><par n="decl-fts-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="ftk"/></r></p><par n="decl-ftk-pers-1"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"> <!-- pass: This paradigm implements the synthetic 
                                         forms and participles which can take negative -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="decl-prc-2"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>վ</l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pass"/></r></p><par n="սիրվ/ել__pass_2"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/></r></p><par n="decl-aor-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fts"/></r></p><par n="decl-fts-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="ftk"/></r></p><par n="decl-ftk-pers-1"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="խոս/ել__vblex_tv_2"> <!-- caus/pass: This paradigm implements the synthetic 
                                         forms and participles which can take negative -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="decl-prc-2"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>վ</l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pass"/></r></p><par n="սիրվ/ել__pass_2"/></e>
      <!-- causative endings here -->

      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/></r></p><par n="decl-aor-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fts"/></r></p><par n="decl-fts-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="ftk"/></r></p><par n="decl-ftk-pers-1"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="թռչ/ել__vblex_iv_3"> <!-- no pass: This paradigm implements the conditional forms -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cni"/></r></p><par n="decl-fts-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="cnk"/></r></p><par n="decl-ftk-pers-1"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"> <!-- no pass: This paradigm implements the conditional forms -->
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cni"/></r></p><par n="decl-fts-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cnk"/></r></p><par n="decl-ftk-pers-1"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"> <!-- pass: This paradigm implements the conditional forms -->
      <e>       <p><l>վ</l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pass"/></r></p><par n="սիրվ/ել__pass_3"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cni"/></r></p><par n="decl-fts-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cnk"/></r></p><par n="decl-ftk-pers-1"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="խոս/ել__vblex_tv_3"> <!-- caus/pass: This paradigm implements the conditional forms -->
      <e>       <p><l>վ</l><r>ել<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pass"/></r></p><par n="սիրվ/ել__pass_3"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cni"/></r></p><par n="decl-fts-pers-1"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="cnk"/></r></p><par n="decl-ftk-pers-1"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="թռ/չել__vblex_iv"> <!-- No passive -->
      <e><i></i><par n="թռ/չել__vblex_iv_1"/></e>
      <e><i></i><par n="թռ/չել__vblex_iv_2"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"> <!-- No passive -->
      <e><i></i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_1"/></e>
      <e><i></i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"> <!-- Has passive -->
      <e><i></i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_1"/></e>
      <e><i></i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="խոս/ել__vblex_tv"> <!-- Has passive and causative -->
      <e><i></i><par n="խոս/ել__vblex_tv_1"/></e>
      <e><i></i><par n="խոս/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    </pardef>
  
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="այրվել"><i>այրվ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="այրվել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>այրվ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="այրվել"><p><l>կայրվ</l><r>այրվ</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="առոգել" r="LR"><p><l>առոգ</l><r>առոգան</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="առոգել" r="LR"><par n="part-neg"/><p><l>առոգ</l><r>առոգան</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="առոգել" r="LR"><p><l>կառոգ</l><r>առոգան</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="բաջաղել"><i>բաջաղ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="բաջաղել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>բաջաղ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="բաջաղել"><p><l>կբաջաղ</l><r>բաջաղ</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="բռնել"><i>բռն</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="բռնել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>բռն</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="բռնել"><p><l>կբռն</l><r>բռն</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="դավաճանել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>դավաճան</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="դավաճանել"><p><l>կդավաճան</l><r>դավաճան</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="զգածվել"><i>զգածվ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="զգածվել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>զգածվ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="զգածվել"><p><l>կզգածվ</l><r>զգածվ</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="խորխել"><i>խորխ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="խորխել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>խորխ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="խորխել"><p><l>կխորխ</l><r>խորխ</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="կտակել"><i>կտակ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="կտակել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>կտակ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="կտակել"><p><l>կկտակ</l><r>կտակ</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="հարնչել"><i>հարնչ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="հարնչել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>հարնչ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="հարնչել"><p><l>կհարնչ</l><r>հարնչ</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="մաքրել"><i>մաքր</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="մաքրել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>մաքր</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="մաքրել"><p><l>կմաքր</l><r>մաքր</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="շնչել"><i>շնչ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="շնչել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>շնչ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="շնչել"><p><l>կշնչ</l><r>շնչ</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="պառկել"><i>պառկ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="պառկել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>պառկ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="պառկել"><p><l>կպառկ</l><r>պառկ</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="սրտառել"><i>սրտառ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="սրտառել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>սրտառ</i><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="սրտառել"><p><l>կսրտառ</l><r>սրտառ</r></p><par n="ուզ/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="խոսել"><i>խոս</i><par n="խոս/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="խոսել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>խոս</i><par n="խոս/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="խոսել"><p><l>կխոս</l><r>խոս</r></p><par n="խոս/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="ազատել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>ազատ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="ազատել"><p><l>կազատ</l><r>ազատ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="ատել"><i>ատ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ատել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>ատ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="ատել"><p><l>կատ</l><r>ատ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="բուծել"><i>բուծ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="բուծել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>բուծ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="բուծել"><p><l>կբուծ</l><r>բուծ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="դրվատել"><i>դրվատ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="դրվատել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>դրվատ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="դրվատել"><p><l>կդրվատ</l><r>դրվատ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="ընդելուզել"><i>ընդելուզ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ընդելուզել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>ընդելուզ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="ընդելուզել"><p><l>կընդելուզ</l><r>ընդելուզ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="լքել"><i>լք</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="լքել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>լք</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="լքել"><p><l>կլք</l><r>լք</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="ծնել"><i>ծն</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ծնել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>ծն</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="ծնել"><p><l>կծն</l><r>ծն</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="կրկնել"><i>կրկն</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="կրկնել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>կրկն</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="կրկնել"><p><l>կկրկն</l><r>կրկն</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="հեռել"><i>հեռ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="հեռել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>հեռ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="հեռել"><p><l>կհեռ</l><r>հեռ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="պաչել"><i>պաչ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="պաչել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>պաչ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="պաչել"><p><l>կպաչ</l><r>պաչ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="տանջել"><i>տանջ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="տանջել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>տանջ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="տանջել"><p><l>կտանջ</l><r>տանջ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="քաղել"><i>քաղ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="քաղել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>քաղ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="քաղել"><p><l>կքաղ</l><r>քաղ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="օծել"><i>օծ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="օծել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>օծ</i><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="օծել"><p><l>կօծ</l><r>օծ</r></p><par n="սիր/ել__vblex_tv_3"/></e>
    <e lm="թռչել"><i>թռ</i><par n="թռ/չել__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="թռչել"><par n="part-neg"/><i>թռ</i><par n="թռ/չել__vblex_iv_2"/></e>
    <e lm="թռչել"><p><l>կթռչ</l><r>թռչ</r></p><par n="թռչ/ել__vblex_iv_3"/></e>
